Alabama, session 2026rs, SB247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
13 Section 1. Section 10A-20-6.17 is added to the Code of
14 Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
15 §10A-20-6.17
16 (a) For the purposes of this section, the following
17 terms have the following meaning:
18 (1) AFFILIATE. As defined in Section 27-29-1.
19 (2) CONTROL. As defined in Section 27-29-1.
20 (3) DEPARTMENT. The Department of Insurance of the
21 State of Alabama.
22 (4) INSURER. Any person that meets the definition of
23 insurer in either Section 27-1-2 or Section 27-29-1.
24 (5) MEMBER. As defined in Section 10A-3A-1.02.
25 (6) MEMBERSHIP INTERESTS. As defined in Section
26 10A-3A-1.02.
27 (7) NONPROFIT HOLDING CORPORATION. A domestic nonprofit
28 corporation formed in connection with a reorganization that
Page 1

corporation formed in connection with a reorganization that
SB247 Enrolled
29 operates under Chapter 3A and that, directly or indirectly
30 through another domestic nonprofit corporation that operates
31 under Chapter 3A, holds all the membership interests in a
32 health care service corporation organized under this article.
33 (8) PERSON. As defined in Section 10A-1-1.03.
34 (9) REORGANIZATION. A transaction or series of
35 transactions in which a nonprofit holding corporation is
36 created by or on behalf of a health care service corporation
37 to hold, directly or indirectly through another domestic
38 nonprofit corporation operating under Chapter 3A, a membership
39 interest in the health care service corporation.
40 (10) SUBSIDIARY. As defined in Section 27-29-1.
41 (11) ULTIMATE CONTROLLING PERSON. A person that is not
42 under the control of any other person.
43 (b)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
44 article, a health care service corporation, including a
45 subsidiary of a health care service corporation, by means of
46 one reorganization, may have a nonprofit holding corporation
47 as the ultimate controlling person.
48 (2) The reorganization shall:
49 a. Be deemed an internal restructuring that does not
50 result in a change of control of a health care service
51 corporation or any subsidiary of a health care service
52 corporation, including an insurer;
53 b. Not be deemed an acquisition or change of control of
54 a health care service corporation or any subsidiary of a
55 health care service corporation, including an insurer;
56 c. Not be subject to Section 27-29-3 or Section
Page 2

c. Not be subject to Section 27-29-3 or Section
SB247 Enrolled
57 27-29-3.1.
58 (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
59 including this title or Chapter 29 of Title 27, as part of the
60 reorganization, a health care service corporation may make an
61 initial transfer of any combination of cash, investments, or
62 equity ownership interests in an affiliate or a subsidiary to
63 the nonprofit holding corporation or its subsidiary by
64 dividend, distribution, or other means, subject to both of the
65 following conditions:
66 a. The total statutory value of cash, investments, and
67 ownership interests in an affiliate or a subsidiary, net of
68 liabilities, shall not exceed 25 percent of the health care
69 service corporation's admitted assets as of its most current
70 annual statement filed with the department.
71 b. The transfer shall be subject to any risk-based
72 capital requirements imposed by the department which the
73 health care service corporation is operating under at the time
74 of the reorganization.
75 (4) A director, officer, or employee of the health care
76 service corporation shall not receive any fee, commission,
77 additional compensation, or other valuable consideration for
78 aiding, promoting, or assisting in the reorganization.
79 (5) Compliance with this subsection and subsections (c)
80 and (d) shall be the exclusive means of effecting the
81 reorganization. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
82 including Chapter 29 of Title 27, no filings, notices,
83 applications, or approvals, other than those filings and
84 notices required in subsection (d), shall be required in
Page 3

notices required in subsection (d), shall be required in
SB247 Enrolled
85 connection with the reorganization, including a transfer
86 pursuant to subdivision (b)(3).
87 (c)(1) Notwithstanding any law of this state, or
88 provision to the contrary in the certificate of formation or
89 governing bylaws, a health care service corporation, by action
90 of its board of directors, may authorize the reorganization
91 and undertake the actions provided in this subsection.
92 (2) Take all steps necessary under Chapter 3A to create
93 a nonprofit holding corporation.
94 (3) Adopt amendments to the health care service
95 corporation's certificate of formation and bylaws to provide
96 for, but not be limited to, any of the following:
97 a. A class of members.
98 b. Characteristics, qualifications, limitations,
99 obligations, and rights of class members, including final
100 distributions.
101 c. Conditions for admission of members and issuance of
102 membership interests.
103 (d) Upon completion of the reorganization, a health
104 care service corporation shall submit a notice of completion
105 to the department, to which shall be attached all of the
106 following:
107 (1) A description of the transactions that effect the
108 reorganization.
109 (2) A copy of the amendments to the health care service
110 corporation's certificate of formation and bylaws.
111 (3) A copy of the nonprofit holding corporation's
112 certificate of incorporation.
Page 4

certificate of incorporation.
SB247 Enrolled
113 (4) A pro forma balance sheet and income statement for
114 the health care service corporation which demonstrates the
115 financial position of the health care service corporation on
116 the effective date of the reorganization.
117 (5) A pro forma balance sheet and income statement for
118 the nonprofit holding corporation that demonstrates the
119 financial position of the nonprofit holding corporation on the
120 effective date of the reorganization.
121 (e)(1) As a result of being created pursuant to this
122 section, a nonprofit holding corporation is:
123 a. Not deemed to be an insurance company, insurer, or a
124 health care service corporation organized under this article;
125 b. Not otherwise subject to this article;
126 c. A nonprofit corporation that is subject to Chapter
127 3A and which has no members; and
128 d. The ultimate controlling person of the health care
129 service corporation.
130 (2) No subsidiary or affiliate of a nonprofit holding
131 corporation is subject to this article unless the subsidiary
132 or affiliate is organized under this article as a health care
133 service corporation.
134 (f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in
135 addition to any transfer in connection with the reorganization
136 under subdivision (b)(3), a nonprofit holding corporation may
137 at any time directly or indirectly:
138 (1) Organize, acquire, hold, operate, manage, and
139 invest in any person, including any insurer, subsidiary, or
140 affiliate; and
Page 5

affiliate; and
SB247 Enrolled
141 (2) Enter into or engage in any operation, business,
142 transfer, sale, purchase, exchange, loan, agreement,
143 transaction, or other activity subject to compliance with any
144 applicable provision of Chapter 3A or Chapter 29 of Title 27.
145 (g) A nonprofit holding corporation, no later than June
146 1 of each year, shall file with the department a group capital
147 calculation for the preceding calendar year.
148 (h) The board of directors of a nonprofit holding
149 corporation shall be comprised solely of individuals who are
150 directors of the health care service corporation. No equity or
151 ownership interest in the nonprofit holding corporation or any
152 subsidiary thereof may be granted to any executive officer or
153 any member of the board of directors of the nonprofit holding
154 corporation or the health care service corporation.
155 (i) The department may exercise the authority provided
156 under Section 27-2-7 and Section 27-2-19 for purposes of
157 enforcing the nonprofit holding corporation's compliance with
158 this section.
159 (j)(1) The reorganization does not change the legal
160 form of a health care service corporation or the health care
161 service corporation's certificate of authority to do business.
162 (2) All subscriber contracts and certificates issued by
163 the health care service corporation shall remain in full force
164 and effect.
165 (3) Upon reorganization, a health care service
166 corporation shall continue to be subject to this article,
167 except for all of the following:
168 a. Neither the reorganization nor any other transaction
Page 6

a. Neither the reorganization nor any other transaction
SB247 Enrolled
169 permitted by this section shall constitute or require a
170 conversion of the health care service corporation pursuant to
171 any law of this state.
172 b. In addition to a transfer in connection with the
173 reorganization under subdivision (b)(3), the health care
174 service corporation may approve and pay any direct or indirect
175 dividend or distribution to the nonprofit holding corporation
176 if the dividend or distribution satisfies the applicable
177 standards for payment of a dividend or distribution pursuant
178 to Sections 10A-3A-6.40, 27-29-4(e), and 27-29-5.
179 c. To the extent not otherwise addressed in, and not
180 contrary to, the certificate of formation or bylaws of the
181 health care service corporation as amended, or this section,
182 all aspects of the membership relationship between the health
183 care service corporation and its member nonprofit holding
184 corporation resulting from the reorganization shall be
185 governed by the applicable provisions of Chapter 3A.
186 d. A health care service corporation that has completed
187 the reorganization is permitted, pursuant to Section
188 10A-1-8.02, and subject to any required filings and approvals
189 under Chapter 29 of Title 27, to merge with any domestic or
190 foreign nonprofit corporation if the health care service
191 corporation is the surviving corporation in the merger.
192 (k) As to a person operating one or more hospitals as
193 defined in Section 22-21-20 in the State of Alabama or
194 operating any other direct health care provider in the State
195 of Alabama, a nonprofit holding corporation, including its
196 affiliates, shall not control, directly or indirectly, or own
Page 7

affiliates, shall not control, directly or indirectly, or own
SB247 Enrolled
197 in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, the person. This
198 subsection shall not prohibit the acquisition of such a person
199 that is a foreign entity if the nonprofit holding corporation
200 agrees to have divested the person's direct health care
201 provider in the State of Alabama within two years after the
202 acquisition closes. As used in this subsection, neither the
203 term "affiliate" nor the term "person" shall mean or include,
204 and the restrictions in this subsection shall not apply with
205 respect to, a health care service corporation organized under
206 this article or a subsidiary thereof.
207 (l) Except if existing before or resulting from the
208 reorganization, the nonprofit holding corporation, including
209 its affiliates, shall not control, directly or indirectly, or
210 own in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, any of the
211 following entities providing health insurance in the State of
212 Alabama:
213 (1) An insurance company licensed pursuant to Chapter 3
214 of Title 27.
215 (2) A health care service plan formed after calendar
216 year 2025 and licensed pursuant to this article.
217 (3) A fraternal benefit society licensed pursuant to
218 Chapter 34 of Title 27.
219 (4) A health maintenance organization licensed pursuant
220 to Chapter 21A of Title 27.
221 (m) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, nothing
222 in this section is intended to, nor shall prevent, limit, or
223 restrict in any way, any direct or indirect acquisition,
224 ownership, transaction, business, investment, or other
Page 8

ownership, transaction, business, investment, or other
SB247 Enrolled
225 activity that is made, held, or conducted by a health care
226 service corporation or a subsidiary of a health care service
227 corporation that is otherwise permissible for that person
228 under applicable law.
229 (n) Following the reorganization, if a transaction
230 involving a health care service corporation: (i) requires
231 notice to the commissioner of the department pursuant to
232 Section 27-29-5(b)(1)a.1.; and (ii) exceeds five percent of
233 the health care service corporation's admitted assets as of
234 the 31st day of December next preceding, then in addition to
235 other applicable requirements under Section 27-29-5, the
236 department shall provide the public with notice and an
237 opportunity for a period of 30 days following the date of the
238 public notice, to provide written comments to the department
239 on the transaction, and the transaction at issue may be
240 entered into unless the commissioner of the department
241 disapproves the transaction with the 30-day comment period.
242 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
243 1, 2026.
Page 9

1, 2026.
SB247 Enrolled
244
245
246
247
248
249
250 ________________________________________________
251 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
252
253
254
255 ________________________________________________
256 Speaker of the House of Representatives
257
258
259 SB247
260 Senate 17-Feb-26
261 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
262 the Senate, as amended.
263
264 Patrick Harris,
265 Secretary.
266
267
268
269
270 House of Representatives
271 Amended and passed: 17-Mar-26
272
273
274
275
276 Senate concurred in House amendment
277
278
279
280
281 By: Senator Jones
Page 10